District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.09

Compensation — Mayor and members of Council; Attorney General.

(a)

Repealed.

(a-1)

In accordance with § 1-204.21(d), effective January 2, 2007, the Mayor shall receive annual compensation in the amount of $200,000, which shall be payable in equal and periodic installments. The compensation shall not be subject to step, cost of living, or other increases.

(b)

(1)

Members of the Council shall receive compensation in the amount of $115,000 per year; except that the Chairman shall receive compensation pursuant to § 1-204.03(d), which shall be payable in equal and periodic installments. The compensation shall be subject to cost of living increases, but not to step or other increases. For the purposes of this section “cost of living increases” means the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (all items Washington D.C. Standard Metropolitan Statistical Area average), published on January 1 of each year.

(2)

In determining the proper salary level of the Council, the Council shall consider at a minimum:

(A)

The salary level of executive agency heads;

(B)

Pay increases for nonunion employees of the District;

(C)

Any other information the Council deems necessary; and

(D)

The recommendations of the Mayor and Council Compensation Advisory Commission established by subchapter XI-A of this chapter.

(b-1)

In accordance with § 1-301.85, the Attorney General shall receive compensation in an amount equal to the Chairman of the Council.

(c)

Repealed.

(d)

In determining the proper compensation level for the Mayor, the Council shall consider the recommendations of the Mayor and the Council Compensation Advisory Commission established by subchapter XI-A of this chapter.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1109, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-175, §§ 2, 3(a), 33 DCR 7232
Mar. 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-225, § 2, 41 DCR 8132
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(n)(5), 45 DCR 2464
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 502, 46 DCR 6373
Apr. 7, 2006, D.C. Law 16-91, § 110(d), 52 DCR 10637
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-295, § 2(a), 54 DCR 1092
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1033(e), 62 DCR 10905

Request for Congressional action: Pursuant to § 5 of D.C. Law 10-168 and § 5 of D.C. Law 10-225 the Council requested that the United States Congress enact legislation to repeal § 1-204.03(c).

Applicability of § 101(n) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-611.02.

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 1033(e) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 3 and 5 of the Chief Financial Officer Compensation Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-140, July 31, 2013, 60 DCR 11792, 20 DCSTAT 1984).
For temporary (90-day) repeal of D.C. Law 10-225, see § 503 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 502 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(d) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-115, July 18, 1997, 44 DCR 4501), see § 2(d) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-179, October 30, 1997, 44 DCR 6948), and see § 2(d) of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-378, June 5, 1998, 45 DCR 4465).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 2-139, § 1109a, see §§ 3 and 4 of the Chief Financial Officer Compensation Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-44, October 24, 2013, 60 DCR 14957).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-36, October 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 6554).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Councilmembers’ Salary Freeze Temporary Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Law 10-168, August 27, 1994, law notification 41 DCR 6403).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 added (b-1).
D.C. Law 16-295 added (a-1), (b)(2)(D) and (d) and made related changes; and rewrote (b)(1).
D.C. Law 16-91, in par. (b)(1), substituted “pursuant to § 1-204.03(d)” for “in the amount of $102,530 per year”.
Section 503 of D.C. Law 13-38 repealed the “Councilmembers’ Salary Freeze Amendment Act of 1994” (D.C. Law 10-225).
“The Chairman of the Council shall receive compensation in an amount equivalent to the highest rate of basic pay authorized for an executive agency head, which shall be made in equal and periodic installments. Each member of the Council other than the chairman shall be paid at an annual rate of $10,000 less than the annual compensation established for the Chairman.”
D.C. Law 13-38 rewrote subsec. (b), which previously read:
1973 Ed., § 1-341.9.
1981 Ed., § 1-612.9.
This section is referenced in § 1-123, § 1-602.02, § 1-611.53, § 1-636.02, and § 3-1303.
Members of Congress, limitations on compensation, see § 1-123.
Lottery and charitable games control board, executive director and deputy director, limitations on compensation, see § 3-1303.